North Dakota, session 69, SB2209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-34-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-34-07. Medical screening and acute forensic medical examinations costs -
Reimbursement by attorney general - Use of evidence.
1. An acute forensic medical examination is an examination performed on an alleged victim of
criminal sexual conduct or domestic violence for the purpose of gathering evidence of an
alleged crime and is performed within ninety-sixone hundred twenty hours after the alleged
crime unless good cause is shown for the delay in performing the examination. When an acute
forensic medical examination is performed, the costs incurred by a health care facility or
health care professional for performing the acute forensic medical examination or any
preliminary medical screening examination may not be charged, either directly or through a
third-party payer, to the alleged victim.
2. A child forensic medical examination is an examination performed on an alleged child victim of
criminal sexual conduct, physical abuse, or neglect for the purpose of gathering evidence of
an alleged crime. When a child forensic medical examination is performed, the costs incurred
by a health care facility or health care professional for performing the child forensic medical
examination or any preliminary medical screening examination may not be charged, either
directly or through a third-party payer, to the alleged child victim or the child's parent,
guardian, or custodian.
3. Upon submission of appropriate documentation, the attorney general, within the limits of
legislative appropriations, shall reimburse the health care facility or a health care professional
for the reasonable costs incurred in performing the medical screening and acute forensic
medical examination. The attorney general, subject to legislative appropriations, shall
reimburse each accredited children's advocacy center located in the state for a forensic
interview that is not reimbursable by Medicaid or crime victims compensation.
4. Evidence obtained during a medical examination under this section may not be used against
an alleged victim for the prosecution of the alleged victim for a separate offense.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - ATTORNEY GENERAL - DOMESTIC VIOLENCE FORENSIC
MEDICAL EXAMINATION PROGRAM - REPORTS. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $200,000, or so much of the
sum as may be necessary, to the attorney general in a domestic violence examinations line item for the
purpose of the domestic violence forensic medical examination program for community-based or
hospital-based domestic violence examiner programs and related administrative costs, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. Any organization that receives funding under this
section shall report to the attorney general and the appropriations committees of the seventieth
legislative assembly on the use of the funds received and the outcomes of its programs. The attorney
general shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative assembly on the

S. B. NO. 2209 - PAGE 2
number of victims receiving domestic violence forensic medical examinations and documentation of
collaborative efforts to assist victims, which includes nurses, the hospital or clinic, law enforcement, and
state's attorneys.

S. B. NO. 2209 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2209.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 1 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State